Utah statutes.
77-29-7.   Interstate agreement -- Duty of state agencies and political subdivisions to cooperate.

All courts, departments, agencies, officers and employees of this state and its political subdivisions are hereby directed to enforce the agreement on detainers and to cooperate with one another and with other party states in enforcing the agreement and effectuating its purpose.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

